Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.393

Underground storage tank program—Termination.

The underground storage tank program shall be terminated on July 1, 2029, as provided in RCW 43.131.394.

[ 2018 c 194 s 1; 2007 c 147 s 10; 1998 c 155 s 7.]